Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 12. Higher Education Endowment Accounts

§ 21-16-1201.
Excellence in higher education endowment fund; Hathaway student scholarship endowment fund; distributions by state treasurer; legislative restrictions.

The excellence in higher education endowment fund is created as provided by W.S. 9-4-204(u)(vi).

In addition to the excellence in higher education endowment fund, a student scholarship endowment fund, to be known as the Hathaway student scholarship endowment fund, is established as provided by W.S. 9-4-204(u)(vii).

The state treasurer shall place earnings from the investment of monies in the excellence in higher education endowment fund in an income account for subsequent disbursement as provided in this subsection. Earnings for any fiscal year which are in excess of the spending policy amount established pursuant to W.S. 9-4-719(o) shall be distributed as provided by W.S. 9-4-719(m). The institutions receiving distributions of earnings within the spending policy amount pursuant to this subsection shall only expend ninety percent (90%) of the distribution in fiscal years in which the spending policy amount specified in W.S. 9-4-719(o) is reached or exceeded. In any fiscal year in which the spending policy amount specified in W.S. 9-4-719(o) is not reached, the shortfall in distributions an institution would have received if the spending policy amount had been reached shall be made up in equal parts by an authorization for the institution to expend funds saved under this subsection when the spending policy amount is reached or exceeded and an equal amount appropriated from the excellence in higher education endowment reserve account as provided in W.S. 9-4-719(n). Earnings within the spending policy amount shall be distributed at the times provided in W.S.

9-4-108

as follows:

Two-thirds (2/3) to the University of Wyoming;

The remaining one-third (1/3) equally to each Wyoming community college.

Commencing with the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2006, earnings from the Hathaway student scholarship endowment fund created by this article shall be transferred by the state treasurer to the Hathaway scholarship expenditure account created by W.S.

21-16-1302

.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 190, § 1; 2006, ch. 36, § 2; 2007, ch. 148, § 1; 2008, ch. 113, § 2; 2017 ch. 206, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2021 ch. 144, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2006 amendment,

in (d), added “Commencing with the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2006” at the beginning, inserted “shall be transferred by the state treasurer to the Hathaway scholarship expenditure account created by W.S.

21-16-1302

,” inserted “the Hathaway student scholarship endowment,” inserted “otherwise,” and made related changes.

Laws 2006, ch. 36, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2006.

The 2007 amendment

rewrote the section.

Laws 2007, ch. 148, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 28, 2007.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, in (c), substituted “W.S. 9-4-719(o)” for “W.S. 9-4-713(o)”, substituted “W.S. 9-4-719(m)” for “W.S. 9-4-713(m)”.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (c) added the third and fourth sentences.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, in the last sentence of (c), substituted "at the times provided in W.S.

9-4-108

" for "on a quarterly basis."

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2006, ch. 36, § 6, states: “The scholarships provided under this act shall begin for students graduating from an eligible high school or a home-based educational program or receiving a GED after April 1, 2006 and shall be provided beginning with the fall semester 2006.”

Laws 2007, ch. 148, § 3, states: “Funds distributed from the excellence in higher education endowment account prior to the effective date of this act pursuant to W.S. 21 16 1201(c) and made available for investment by higher education foundations pursuant to W.S. 21 16 1202(a) and 21 16 1203(a) shall be remitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the excellence in higher education endowment fund as provided in this section.
The state treasurer in consultation with the University of Wyoming, each community college and each foundation investing those funds shall provide for the remittance of those funds or investments purchased with those funds as expeditiously as possible, but may delay the remittance in accordance with prudent investment standards in order to maximize total net earnings.”

Appropriations. —

Laws 2005, ch. 190, § 6, appropriates $100,000, or as much thereof as is necessary to fund the education merit scholarship committee in carrying out its duties under the act, from the general fund to the legislative service office. Notwithstanding W.S.

9-2-1008

, 9-2-1012(e) and

9-4-207

, unobligated or unencumbered funds appropriated under this section are not to lapse as of June 30, 2006, but are to remain available for funding of the committee as provided in this act. Prior to making any distribution to the student scholarship endowment account pursuant to W.S. 9-4-601(d)(v) as created by the act, the state treasurer is to first deposit to the general fund $100,000 from those funds as repayment of this appropriation.

Task force. —

Laws 2005, ch. 190, § 3 directs that, prior to any expenditure from the excellence in higher education endowment account established under W.S. 21-16-1201(a), a committee consisting of two University of Wyoming trustees appointed by the president of the board of trustees, one member of the community college commission appointed by the chairman of the commission, one Wyoming community college trustees appointed by the president of the Wyoming association of community college trustees and four business and industry leaders appointed by the governor shall present a plan for the implementation of the endowment that enhances the purposes of the act and furthers the needs of the Wyoming economic, social and educational infrastructure, which plan shall be presented to the joint appropriations and joint education interim committees not later than October 1, 2005. To assist the committee in formulating the plan, the university is to report the results of: (1) public hearings it conducts in the state regarding public interest in areas of excellence; (2) a survey sampling Wyoming high school students' career interests; and (3) information developed by the university through other appropriate means to determine sustainable, long-term programs for the benefit of current and future Wyoming generations.

Laws 2005, ch. 190, § 5, creates an education merit scholarship committee to study the proposals for student scholarship programs proposed in 2005 General Session House Bills 282 (pertaining to student tuition assistance), 307 (also pertaining to student tuition assistance) and 323 (pertaining to the Wyoming SUPER scholarship program) and consider other potential scholarship programs to be funded by the earnings from the student scholarship endowment account created by the act, with the goal of being able to make recommendations to the Wyoming legislature for future legislation needed for merit based scholarship programs, to be known as Hathaway scholarship programs, to make undergraduate post secondary education in Wyoming as free as possible to Wyoming high school graduates. The committee is to consider and make recommendations as to: (1) the amount of tuition, fees and other education related payments which can be sustained from anticipated earnings from the student scholarship endowment account at various qualification levels; (2) reentry requirements for students failing to maintain established college grade point average and other requirements; (3) waiver provisions, if any, regarding any entry or continuing scholarship requirements; (4) administrative oversight of the committee; (5) an implementation date for the program, which shall be no later than the first school year after the student scholarship endowment account contains at least $400,000,000; and (6) additional funding of the program. The committee is to report its initial findings and recommendations to the governor, the joint appropriations and joint education interim committees by November 1, 2005 and, if the committee determines modifications to its initial findings and recommendations are appropriate, again by November 1, 2006.
Laws 2005, ch. 190, § 5 is repealed March 31, 2007.

2005 General Session House Bills 282, 307, and 322 did not pass during the 2005 legislative session.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 190, § 7, makes the act (article) effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art., § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2005.

§ 21-16-1202.
Excellence in higher education endowment fund distributions to University of Wyoming.

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 148, § 2.

The university shall use the earnings received under W.S. 21-16-1201(c)(i) to establish endowed faculty positions and to acquire instructional and resource materials, classroom equipment and other resources necessary to support the work of endowed faculty. The following shall govern the university in the use of these funds:

Funds shall be used for recruitment or retention of faculty with established reputations for excellence in research or instruction and whose presence enhances the educational quality and reputation of the university. As the primary mission of the university is the provision of quality undergraduate and graduate education, faculty selected for research abilities shall also instruct classes in accordance with established university policy;

Not less than two-thirds (2/3) of the earnings received shall be used for the recruitment and retention of faculty possessing abilities necessary to expand university instruction and research in disciplines related to economic and social challenges facing Wyoming, including but not limited to energy, natural resources, wildlife, science, earth sciences, health sciences, agriculture, education and engineering. The purpose of this paragraph is to provide university assistance to the state of Wyoming and its residents to the broadest extent possible, through the diversification of its economy, preservation of its natural and human resources and the enhancement of its quality of life. Not less than four (4) faculty recruited and retained under this paragraph shall be in the college of education;

The remaining earnings received shall be used for the recruitment and retention of faculty with established reputations in teaching and research excellence in other areas of distinction as identified in the university academic plan, including disciplines important to the state and region and its history and culture such as business, arts and humanities, mathematics, cultural studies, economics and law. The purpose of this paragraph is to enhance undergraduate and graduate instruction, to prepare students to become productive and contributing members of society and to promote an appreciation of arts, humanities and other cultures and interests affecting quality of life;

Selection of areas of excellence for endowed faculty chairs shall be:

Made only after the university conducts public hearings for determination of state-wide interest;

Based upon a survey sampling Wyoming high school students’ career interests; and

Developed by the university through other appropriate means to determine sustainable, long-term programs for the benefit of current and future Wyoming generations.

The university may collaborate with community colleges on the use of earnings received from the excellence in higher education endowment fund.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 190, §
1; 2007, ch. 148, §§ 1, 2.

The 2007 amendment

substituted variants of “received under W.S. 21-16-1201(c)(i)” for “from the investment of funds made available through distributions from the excellence in higher education endowment account under this section” and substituted variants of “earnings received” for “amounts made available through the investment of distributions from the excellence in higher education endowment account”; repealed former (a), which related to the transfer of distributions from the excellence in higher education endowment account to the university foundation by the University of Wyoming; and substituted “fund” for “account pursuant to this section” in (c).

Laws 2007, ch. 148, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 28, 2007.

§ 21-16-1203.
Excellence in higher education endowment fund distributions to Wyoming community colleges.

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 148, § 2.

Each community college shall use the earnings received under W.S. 21-16-1201(c)(ii) as provided by this section to establish endowed faculty positions and to acquire instructional and resource materials, classroom equipment and other resources necessary to support the work of the endowed faculty. The following shall govern each community college in the use of these funds:

Funds shall be used for recruitment or retention of faculty, either permanent or temporary, possessing special skills or demonstrated excellence improving the quality of educational and outreach instruction;

The earnings received shall be used for the recruitment and retention of faculty with abilities necessary to establish or expand vocational programs and program quality benefiting communities, businesses and industries within respective service areas. The purpose of this paragraph is to enhance the ability of community colleges to prepare students for a lifetime of higher wages and expanded job opportunities, to provide local and regional businesses and industries with an improved, better trained and better educated workforce and to increase the economic stability of proximate communities and the entire state;

Earnings not expended pursuant to paragraph (ii) of this subsection which are received shall be used for the recruitment and retention of faculty with established reputations in academic areas offered by each individual community college. The purpose of this paragraph is to improve the ability of colleges to better prepare students to pursue bachelor and graduate degrees at the University of Wyoming or other four (4) year institutions and offer additional courses of outreach instruction to high school and adult populations within their service areas.

The community colleges may collaborate with the University of Wyoming on the use of earnings received from the excellence in higher education endowment fund.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 190, §
1; 2007, ch. 148, §§ 1, 2.

The 2007 amendment,

substituted variants of “received under W.S. 21-16-1201(c)(i)” for “from the investment of funds made available through distributions from the excellence in higher education endowment account under this section” and substituted variants of “earnings received” for “amounts made available through the investment of distributions from the excellence in higher education endowment account”; repealed former (a), which read: “Upon receipt of amounts distributed from the excellence in higher education endowment account under W.S. 21-16-1201(c)(ii), each Wyoming community college shall immediately transfer the distributed amount to its foundation to be permanently invested on behalf of the community college. Each community college shall enter into an agreement with its foundation under which the foundation shall manage the funds it receives under this subsection in the same manner as other permanent endowment funds it manages on behalf of the community college. Only the earnings from the investment of these funds may be expended”; and substituted “fund” for “account pursuant to this section” in (c).

Laws 2007, ch. 148, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 28, 2007.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, ch. 148, § 3, provides: “Funds distributed from the excellence in higher education endowment account prior to the effective date of this act pursuant to W.S. 21-16-1201(c) and made available for investment by higher education foundations pursuant to W.S. 21-16-1202(a) and 21-16-1203(a) shall be remitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the excellence in higher education endowment fund as provided in this section. The state treasurer in consultation with the University of Wyoming, each community college and each foundation investing those funds shall provided for the remittance of those funds or investments purchased with those funds as expeditiously as possible, but may delay the remittance in accordance with prudent investment standards in order to maximize total net earnings.”

§ 21-16-1204.
Annual reports; review by committees.

Not later than October 1, 2006, and October 1 of each year thereafter, the University of Wyoming and each Wyoming community college shall report to the joint appropriations and joint education interim committees of the legislature and to the governor on the use and expenditure of earnings from the excellence in higher education endowment fund pursuant to this article, including the following:

Faculty positions partially or fully funded through the endowment program;

The name of each faculty member filling a position identified under paragraph (i) of this subsection, together with that individual’s education and experience and a summary of his research and instructional activities during the preceding academic year;

A description of the benefits of the research or instruction provided by the individual filling a position identified under paragraph (i) of this subsection during the preceding academic year, to students, businesses, industries or to other Wyoming residents as required under this article;

Reserve fund distributions pursuant to W.S. 9-4-719(n).

Upon receipt of reports by the University of Wyoming and each Wyoming community college on the use and expenditure of earnings as required under subsection (a) of this section, the joint appropriations and joint education interim committees shall report to members of the Wyoming legislature and the governor on the progress made by the university and community colleges in achieving the purposes stated under this article for distributions from the excellence in higher education endowment fund and shall recommend any necessary changes to the higher education endowment program to accomplish these purposes. The reports required under this subsection shall be made in sufficient time to enable consideration by the legislature at the general or budget session immediately following the receipt of reports submitted pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 190, §
1; 2007, ch. 148, § 1; 2008, ch. 113, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

in (a), deleted “on the investment of distributions” following “expenditure of earnings,” substituted “account” for “fund”; added (a)(iv); and substituted “fund” for “account” in (b).

Laws 2007, ch. 148, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 28, 2007.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “W.S. 9-4-719(n)” for “W.S. 9-4-713(n)” in (a)(iv).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, ch. 148, § 3, provides: “Funds distributed from the excellence in higher education endowment account prior to the effective date of this act pursuant to W.S. 21-16-1201(c) and made available for investment by higher education foundations pursuant to W.S. 21-16-1202(a) and 21-16-1203(a) shall be remitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the excellence in higher education endowment fund as provided in this section. The state treasurer in consultation with the University of Wyoming, each community college and each foundation investing those funds shall provided for the remittance of those funds or investments purchased with those funds as expeditiously as possible, but may delay the remittance in accordance with prudent investment standards in order to maximize total net earnings.”

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2005, ch. 190, § 4, directs that the first report provided by the university and community colleges pursuant to W.S. 21-16-1204(a) is to be for the period beginning on the effective date of the act (March 3, 2005) and ending on September 1, 2006.